Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1436
Official in the executive branch, defined.

Official in the executive branch shall mean an official holding a state executive office as provided in Article IV, Constitution of Nebraska, including Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Auditor of Public Accounts, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Tax Commissioner, the heads of such other executive departments as set forth in the Constitution or as may be established by law, a deputy thereto, or a member of any state board or commission. This includes an individual who is elected or appointed and has not yet taken, or an individual who is nominated for appointment to, any of the offices enumerated in this section.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 36.